District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.18

Existing taxi regulations.

Except as modified by this subchapter, or until changed by the Commission pursuant to this subchapter, all regulations relating to taxicabs contained in the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations shall remain in effect. Within 9 months of the appointment and confirmation of the Commission and the appointment of the chairperson, the Commission shall cause a republication of all regulations relating to taxicabs, including applicable amendments to conform the regulations to this subchapter, and revisions issued by the Commission.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 19, 33 DCR 703

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-1718.
2001 Ed., § 50-318.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority to the Chairperson of the D.C. Taxicab Commission to establish a fuel surcharge, see Mayor’s Order 2011-64, March 25, 2011 ( 58 DCR 2861).

Editor's Notes

Mayor authorized to appoint Commission prior to effective date: Section 24(c) of D.C. Law 6-97 provided that prior to the effective date specified in § 24(b) (1 year after March 25, 1986), the Mayor is authorized to appoint the members and chairperson of the Commission. Upon confirmation, the chairperson is authorized to appoint the Chief and approve the hiring of the staff of the Office. Following confirmation of a majority of their members, the Commission panels are authorized to issue internal operating procedures and otherwise organize the Commission in preparation for the performance of duties under the act.